Washington statutes.
RCW 10.77.078

Competency evaluation or restoration services—Offer of admission—City or county jail to transport defendant.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1359-S2.SL) ***

(1) A city or county jail shall transport a defendant to a state hospital or other secure facility designated by the department within one day of receipt of an offer of admission of the defendant for competency evaluation or restoration services.

(2) City and county jails must cooperate with competency evaluators and the department to arrange for competency evaluators to have reasonable, timely, and appropriate access to defendants for the purpose of performing evaluations under this chapter to accommodate the seven-day performance target for completing competency evaluations for defendants in custody.

[ 2015 1st sp.s. c 7 s 3.]

NOTES:

Finding—2015 1st sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 10.77.075.

Effective dates—2015 1st sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 10.77.075.